Georgia, session 2025_26, HB434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 12 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions relative to offenses against public health and morals, is amended by
adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"16-12-6.
(a)(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, organization, corporation, hospital, facilitator,
or association of any kind whatsoever which is not a child-placing agency, a prospective
adoptive parent who has a valid, approved preplacement home study report, or an
H. B. 434
- 1 -

LC 48 1434
attorney who is a member of the State Bar of Georgia representing a prospective adoptive
parent who has a valid, approved preplacement home study report to advertise, whether
in a periodical, by television, radio, or any other public medium or by any private means,
including, but not limited to, letters, circulars, handbills, internet postings including social
media, and oral statements, that the person, organization, corporation, hospital, facilitator,
or association of any kind whatsoever will adopt children or will arrange for or cause
children to be adopted or placed for adoption.
(2)(A) Any person, organization, corporation, hospital, facilitator, or association of any
kind whatsoever which is not a child-placing agency that places an advertisement
concerning adoption or prospective adoption shall include in such advertisement its
license number issued by the department.
(B) Any attorney representing a prospective adoptive parent who has a valid, approved
preplacement home study report who places an advertisement concerning adoption or
prospective adoption shall include in such advertisement his or her State Bar of Georgia
license number.
(C) Any individual who places an advertisement concerning being an adoptive parent
shall include in such advertisement that he or she has a valid, approved preplacement
home study report.
(b) It shall be unlawful for any person, organization, corporation, hospital, facilitator, or
association of any kind whatsoever to sell, offer to sell, or conspire with another to sell or
offer to sell a child for money or anything of value, except as otherwise provided in this
article.
(c)(1) As used in this subsection, the term 'inducements' means any financial assistance,
either direct or indirect, from whatever source, but shall expressly not include:
(A) The payment or reimbursement of the medical expenses directly related to the
biological mother's pregnancy and hospitalization for the birth of the child and medical
care for such child if paid by a licensed child-placing agency or an attorney;
H. B. 434
- 2 -

LC 48 1434
(B) The payment or reimbursement of expenses for counseling services or legal
services for a biological parent that are directly related to the placement by such parent
of her or his child for adoption if paid by a licensed child-placing agency or an attorney;
(C) The payment or reimbursement of reasonable living expenses for the biological
mother if paid by a licensed child-placing agency; or
(D) The payment or reimbursement of reasonable expenses for rent, utilities, food,
maternity garments, and maternity accessories for the biological mother if paid from
the trust account of an attorney who is a member of the State Bar of Georgia in good
standing.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person, organization, corporation, hospital, facilitator, or
association of any kind whatsoever to directly or indirectly hold out inducements to any
biological parent to part with his or her child.
(3) It shall be unlawful for any person, organization, corporation, hospital, facilitator, or
association of any kind whatsoever to conspire with another to offer or provide
inducements to a biological parent to part with his or her child.
(4) It shall be unlawful for an individual to knowingly make false representations in
order to obtain inducements.
(5) The report and affidavit filed pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of Code
Section 19-8-13 shall include an itemized accounting of all expenses paid or reimbursed
pursuant to this subsection.
(d)(1) It shall be unlawful for an individual to knowingly accept expenses as set forth in
subparagraph (c)(1)(C) or (c)(1)(D) of this Code section for the adoption of her child or
unborn child if she knows or should have known that she is not pregnant or is not a legal
mother.
(2) It shall be unlawful for an individual to knowingly accept expenses as set forth in
subparagraph (c)(1)(C) or (c)(1)(D) of this Code section from an adoption agency or an
attorney without disclosing that he or she is receiving such expenses from another
H. B. 434
- 3 -

LC 48 1434
adoption agency or attorney in an effort to allow for the adoption of the same child or
unborn child.
(3) It shall be unlawful for an individual to knowingly make false representations in
order to obtain expenses as set forth in subparagraph (c)(1)(C) or (c)(1)(D) of this Code
section.
(4) It shall be unlawful for an individual to make false representations as to the existence
of a pregnancy or the intention to place a child for adoption when such individual knows
or should have known that the person purported to be pregnant is not pregnant or that the
person purported to be offering the child for adoption has no intention of placing the child
for adoption, and such representations cause another to expend financial resources or take
other specific steps, including, but not limited to, travel or retaining the services of an
attorney, agency, or social worker, toward adoption of a child in reasonable reliance on
such representations.
(e) Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon
conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.00, imprisonment for
not less than one nor more than ten years, or both, and shall further be subject to a court
order requiring such person to make restitution to a victim harmed by such person's
violation.
(f)(1) Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to communication by private
means, including written or oral statements, by an individual seeking to:
(A) Adopt a child or children; or
(B) Place such individual's child or children for adoption,
whether the communication occurs before or after the birth of such child or children.
(2) Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to any communication described
in paragraph (1) of this subsection which contains the name of an attorney who is a
member of the State Bar of Georgia, his or her address, his or her telephone number, or
any combination of such information and which requests that the attorney named in such
H. B. 434
- 4 -

LC 48 1434
communication be contacted to facilitate the carrying out of the purpose, as described in
subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, of the individual making
100 such personal communication.
101 (g)(1) Any child-placing agency or individual who is seeking to adopt or seeking to place
102 a child for adoption who is damaged by a violation of this Code section may file a civil
103 action to recover damages, treble damages, reasonable attorney's fees, and expenses of
104 litigation.
105 (2) Any individual who is seeking to adopt or seeking to place a child for adoption who
106 is damaged by a violation of this Code section may file a civil action in tort, provided that
107 such individual would have an existing tort claim under Georgia law."
108 SECTION 2.
109 Article 1 of Chapter 8 of Title 19 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
110 general provisions relative to adoption, is amended by revising paragraph (4) of
111 subsection (c) of Code Section 19-8-13, relating to petition, filing and contents, financial
112 disclosures, attorney's affidavit, and redaction of certain information unnecessary, as follows:
113 "(4) Reasonable expenses for the biological mother as set forth in subparagraph (c)(1)(C)
114 or (c)(1)(D) of Code Section 16-12-6 or 19-8-24;"
115 SECTION 3.
116 Said article is further amended by revising paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code
117 Section 19-8-18, relating to hearing, district attorney to be directed to review inducement
118 violations, decree of adoption, factors considered in determining best interests of child, and
119 disposition of child on denial of petition, as follows:
120 "(3) If the adoption petition is filed pursuant to Code Section 19-8-5, the court shall
121 examine the financial disclosures required under subsections (c) and (d) of Code
122 Section 19-8-13 and make such further examination of each petitioner and his or her
H. B. 434
- 5 -

LC 48 1434
123 attorney as the court deems appropriate in order to make a determination as to whether
124 there is cause to believe that Code Section 16-12-6 or 19-8-24 has been violated with
125 regard to the inducement, as such term is defined in Code Section 16-12-6 and 19-8-24,
126 of the placement of the child for adoption. Should the court determine that further
127 inquiry is in order, the court shall direct the district attorney for the county to review the
128 matter further and to take such appropriate action as the district attorney in his or her
129 discretion deems appropriate."
130 SECTION 4.
131 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 434
- 6 -